Illinois, session 104th, HB1647.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Sections 10-1-7.1, 10-1-7.2, 10-2.1-6.3, and 610-2.1-6.4 as follows: 7    (65 ILCS 5/10-1-7.1)8    Sec. 10-1-7.1. Original appointments; full-time fire 9department.10    (a) Applicability. Unless a commission elects to follow 11the provisions of Section 10-1-7.2, this Section shall apply 12to all original appointments to an affected full-time fire 13department. Existing registers of eligibles shall continue to 14be valid until their expiration dates, or up to a maximum of 2 15years after August 4, 2011 (the effective date of Public Act 1697-251).17    Notwithstanding any statute, ordinance, rule, or other law 18to the contrary, all original appointments to an affected 19department to which this Section applies shall be administered 20in the manner provided for in this Section. Provisions of the 21Illinois Municipal Code, municipal ordinances, and rules 22adopted pursuant to such authority and other laws relating to 23initial hiring of firefighters in affected departments shall   HB1647- 2 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1continue to apply to the extent they are compatible with this 2Section, but in the event of a conflict between this Section 3and any other law, this Section shall control.4    A home rule or non-home rule municipality may not 5administer its fire department process for original 6appointments in a manner that is less stringent than this 7Section. This Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of 8Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 9concurrent exercise by home rule units of the powers and 10functions exercised by the State.11    A municipality that is operating under a court order or 12consent decree regarding original appointments to a full-time 13fire department before August 4, 2011 (the effective date of 14Public Act 97-251) is exempt from the requirements of this 15Section for the duration of the court order or consent decree. 16    Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection 17(a), this Section does not apply to a municipality with more 18than 1,000,000 inhabitants. 19    (b) Original appointments. All original appointments made 20to an affected fire department shall be made from a register of 21eligibles established in accordance with the processes 22established by this Section. Only persons who meet or exceed 23the performance standards required by this Section shall be 24placed on a register of eligibles for original appointment to 25an affected fire department.26    Whenever an appointing authority authorizes action to hire   HB1647- 3 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1a person to perform the duties of a firefighter or to hire a 2firefighter-paramedic to fill a position that is a new 3position or vacancy due to resignation, discharge, promotion, 4death, the granting of a disability or retirement pension, or 5any other cause, the appointing authority shall appoint to 6that position the person with the highest ranking on the final 7eligibility list. If the appointing authority has reason to 8conclude that the highest ranked person fails to meet the 9minimum standards for the position or if the appointing 10authority believes an alternate candidate would better serve 11the needs of the department, then the appointing authority has 12the right to pass over the highest ranked person and appoint 13either: (i) any person who has a ranking in the top 5% of the 14register of eligibles or (ii) any person who is among the top 5 15highest ranked persons on the list of eligibles if the number 16of people who have a ranking in the top 5% of the register of 17eligibles is less than 5 people.18    Any candidate may pass on an appointment once without 19losing his or her position on the register of eligibles. Any 20candidate who passes a second time may be removed from the list 21by the appointing authority provided that such action shall 22not prejudice a person's opportunities to participate in 23future examinations, including an examination held during the 24time a candidate is already on the municipality's register of 25eligibles.26    The sole authority to issue certificates of appointment   HB1647- 4 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1shall be vested in the Civil Service Commission. All 2certificates of appointment issued to any officer or member of 3an affected department shall be signed by the chairperson and 4secretary, respectively, of the commission upon appointment of 5such officer or member to the affected department by the 6commission. After being selected from the register of 7eligibles to fill a vacancy in the affected department, each 8appointee shall be presented with his or her certificate of 9appointment on the day on which he or she is sworn in as a 10classified member of the affected department. Firefighters who 11were not issued a certificate of appointment when originally 12appointed shall be provided with a certificate within 10 days 13after making a written request to the chairperson of the Civil 14Service Commission. Each person who accepts a certificate of 15appointment and successfully completes his or her probationary 16period shall be enrolled as a firefighter and as a regular 17member of the fire department.18    For the purposes of this Section, "firefighter" means any 19person who has been prior to, on, or after August 4, 2011 (the 20effective date of Public Act 97-251) appointed to a fire 21department or fire protection district, or employed by a State 22university, unit of local government, or Emergency Medical 23Services (EMS) System, and sworn or commissioned or employed 24to perform (i) firefighter duties, (ii) or paramedic, 25emergency medical technician (EMT), emergency medical 26technician-basic (EMT-B), emergency medical   HB1647- 5 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1technician-intermediate (EMT-I), or advanced emergency medical 2technician (A-EMT) duties, (iii) or both, except that the 3following persons are not included: part-time firefighters; 4auxiliary, reserve, or voluntary firefighters, including 5paid-on-call firefighters; clerks and dispatchers or other 6civilian employees of a fire department or fire protection 7district who are not routinely expected to perform firefighter 8duties; and elected officials.9    (c) Qualification for placement on register of eligibles. 10The purpose of establishing a register of eligibles is to 11identify applicants who possess and demonstrate the mental 12aptitude and physical ability to perform the duties required 13of members of the fire department in order to provide the 14highest quality of service to the public. To this end, all 15applicants for original appointment to an affected fire 16department shall be subject to examination and testing which 17shall be public, competitive, and open to all applicants 18unless the municipality shall by ordinance limit applicants to 19residents of the municipality, county or counties in which the 20municipality is located, State, or nation. Any examination and 21testing procedure utilized under subsection (e) of this 22Section shall be supported by appropriate validation evidence 23and shall comply with all applicable State and federal laws. 24Municipalities may establish educational, emergency medical 25service licensure, and other prerequisites for participation 26in an examination or for hire as a firefighter. Any   HB1647- 6 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1municipality may charge a fee to cover the costs of the 2application process.3    Residency requirements in effect at the time an individual 4enters the fire service of a municipality cannot be made more 5restrictive for that individual during his or her period of 6service for that municipality, or be made a condition of 7promotion, except for the rank or position of fire chief and 8for no more than 2 positions that rank immediately below that 9of the chief rank which are appointed positions pursuant to 10the Fire Department Promotion Act.11    No person who is 35 years of age or older shall be eligible 12to take an examination for a position as a firefighter unless 13the person has had previous employment status as a firefighter 14in the regularly constituted fire department of the 15municipality, except as provided in this Section. The age 16limitation does not apply to:17        (1) any person previously employed as a full-time 18    firefighter in a regularly constituted fire department of 19    (i) any municipality or fire protection district located 20    in Illinois, (ii) a fire protection district whose 21    obligations were assumed by a municipality under Section 22    21 of the Fire Protection District Act, or (iii) a 23    municipality whose obligations were taken over by a fire 24    protection district,25        (2) any person who has served a municipality as a 26    regularly enrolled volunteer, paid-on-call, or part-time   HB1647- 7 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1    firefighter, or2        (3) any person who turned 35 while serving as a member 3    of the active or reserve components of any of the branches 4    of the Armed Forces of the United States or the National 5    Guard of any state, whose service was characterized as 6    honorable or under honorable, if separated from the 7    military, and is currently under the age of 40. 8    No person who is under 21 years of age shall be eligible 9for employment as a firefighter.10    No applicant shall be examined concerning his or her 11political or religious opinions or affiliations. The 12examinations shall be conducted by the commissioners of the 13municipality or their designees and agents.14    No municipality shall require that any firefighter 15appointed to the lowest rank serve a probationary employment 16period of longer than one year of actual active employment, 17which may exclude periods of training, or injury or illness 18leaves, including duty related leave, in excess of 30 calendar 19days. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this 20Section, the probationary employment period limitation may be 21extended for a firefighter who is required, as a condition of 22employment, to be a licensed paramedic, during which time the 23sole reason that a firefighter may be discharged without a 24hearing is for failing to meet the requirements for paramedic 25licensure.26    In the event that any applicant who has been found   HB1647- 8 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1eligible for appointment and whose name has been placed upon 2the final eligibility register provided for in this Division 1 3has not been appointed to a firefighter position within one 4year after the date of his or her physical ability 5examination, the commission may cause a second examination to 6be made of that applicant's physical ability prior to his or 7her appointment. If, after the second examination, the 8physical ability of the applicant shall be found to be less 9than the minimum standard fixed by the rules of the 10commission, the applicant shall not be appointed. The 11applicant's name may be retained upon the register of 12candidates eligible for appointment and when next reached for 13certification and appointment that applicant may be again 14examined as provided in this Section, and if the physical 15ability of that applicant is found to be less than the minimum 16standard fixed by the rules of the commission, the applicant 17shall not be appointed, and the name of the applicant shall be 18removed from the register.19    (d) Notice, examination, and testing components. Notice of 20the time, place, general scope, merit criteria for any 21subjective component, and fee of every examination shall be 22given by the commission, by a publication at least 2 weeks 23preceding the examination: (i) in one or more newspapers 24published in the municipality, or if no newspaper is published 25therein, then in one or more newspapers with a general 26circulation within the municipality, or (ii) on the   HB1647- 9 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1municipality's Internet website. Additional notice of the 2examination may be given as the commission shall prescribe.3    The examination and qualifying standards for employment of 4firefighters shall be based on: mental aptitude, physical 5ability, preferences, moral character, and health. The mental 6aptitude, physical ability, and preference components shall 7determine an applicant's qualification for and placement on 8the final register of eligibles. The examination may also 9include a subjective component based on merit criteria as 10determined by the commission. Scores from the examination must 11be made available to the public.12    (e) Mental aptitude. No person who does not possess at 13least a high school diploma or an equivalent high school 14education shall be placed on a register of eligibles. 15Examination of an applicant's mental aptitude shall be based 16upon a written examination. The examination shall be practical 17in character and relate to those matters that fairly test the 18capacity of the persons examined to discharge the duties 19performed by members of a fire department. Written 20examinations shall be administered in a manner that ensures 21the security and accuracy of the scores achieved.22    (f) Physical ability. All candidates shall be required to 23undergo an examination of their physical ability to perform 24the essential functions included in the duties they may be 25called upon to perform as a member of a fire department. For 26the purposes of this Section, essential functions of the job   HB1647- 10 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1are functions associated with duties that a firefighter may be 2called upon to perform in response to emergency calls. The 3frequency of the occurrence of those duties as part of the fire 4department's regular routine shall not be a controlling factor 5in the design of examination criteria or evolutions selected 6for testing. These physical examinations shall be open, 7competitive, and based on industry standards designed to test 8each applicant's physical abilities in the following 9dimensions:10        (1) Muscular strength to perform tasks and evolutions 11    that may be required in the performance of duties 12    including grip strength, leg strength, and arm strength. 13    Tests shall be conducted under anaerobic as well as 14    aerobic conditions to test both the candidate's speed and 15    endurance in performing tasks and evolutions. Tasks tested 16    may be based on standards developed, or approved, by the 17    local appointing authority.18        (2) The ability to climb ladders, operate from 19    heights, walk or crawl in the dark along narrow and uneven 20    surfaces, and operate in proximity to hazardous 21    environments.22        (3) The ability to carry out critical, time-sensitive, 23    and complex problem solving during physical exertion in 24    stressful and hazardous environments. The testing 25    environment may be hot and dark with tightly enclosed 26    spaces, flashing lights, sirens, and other distractions.  HB1647- 11 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1    The tests utilized to measure each applicant's 2capabilities in each of these dimensions may be tests based on 3industry standards currently in use or equivalent tests 4approved by the Joint Labor-Management Committee of the Office 5of the State Fire Marshal.6    Physical ability examinations administered under this 7Section shall be conducted with a reasonable number of 8proctors and monitors, open to the public, and subject to 9reasonable regulations of the commission.10    (g) Scoring of examination components. Appointing 11authorities may create a preliminary eligibility register. A 12person shall be placed on the list based upon his or her 13passage of the written examination or the passage of the 14written examination and the physical ability component. 15Passage of the written examination means attaining the minimum 16score set by the commission. Minimum scores should be set by 17the commission so as to demonstrate a candidate's ability to 18perform the essential functions of the job. The minimum score 19set by the commission shall be supported by appropriate 20validation evidence and shall comply with all applicable State 21and federal laws. The appointing authority may conduct the 22physical ability component and any subjective components 23subsequent to the posting of the preliminary eligibility 24register.25    The examination components for an initial eligibility 26register shall be graded on a 100-point scale. A person's   HB1647- 12 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1position on the list shall be determined by the following: (i) 2the person's score on the written examination, (ii) the person 3successfully passing the physical ability component, and (iii) 4the person's results on any subjective component as described 5in subsection (d). 6    In order to qualify for placement on the final eligibility 7register, an applicant's score on the written examination, 8before any applicable preference points or subjective points 9are applied, shall be at or above the minimum score set by the 10commission. The local appointing authority may prescribe the 11score to qualify for placement on the final eligibility 12register, but the score shall not be less than the minimum 13score set by the commission.14    The commission shall prepare and keep a register of 15persons whose total score is not less than the minimum score 16for passage and who have passed the physical ability 17examination. These persons shall take rank upon the register 18as candidates in the order of their relative excellence based 19on the highest to the lowest total points scored on the mental 20aptitude, subjective component, and preference components of 21the test administered in accordance with this Section. No more 22than 60 days after each examination, an initial eligibility 23list shall be posted by the commission. The list shall include 24the final grades of the candidates without reference to 25priority of the time of examination and subject to claim for 26preference credit.  HB1647- 13 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1    Commissions may conduct additional examinations, including 2without limitation a polygraph test, after a final eligibility 3register is established and before it expires with the 4candidates ranked by total score without regard to date of 5examination. No more than 60 days after each examination, an 6initial eligibility list shall be posted by the commission 7showing the final grades of the candidates without reference 8to priority of time of examination and subject to claim for 9preference credit.10    (h) Preferences. The following are preferences:11        (1) Veteran preference. Persons who were engaged in 12    the military service of the United States for a period of 13    at least one year of active duty and who were honorably 14    discharged therefrom, or who are now or have been members 15    on inactive or reserve duty in such military or naval 16    service, shall be preferred for appointment to and 17    employment with the fire department of an affected 18    department.19        (2) Fire cadet preference. Persons who have 20    successfully completed 2 years of study in fire techniques 21    or cadet training within a cadet program established under 22    the rules of the Joint Labor and Management Committee 23    (JLMC), as defined in Section 50 of the Fire Department 24    Promotion Act, may be preferred for appointment to and 25    employment with the fire department.26        (3) Educational preference. Persons who have   HB1647- 14 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1    successfully obtained an associate's degree in the field 2    of fire service or emergency medical services, or a 3    bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university 4    may be preferred for appointment to and employment with 5    the fire department.6        (4) Paramedic preference. Persons who have obtained a 7    license as a paramedic may be preferred for appointment to 8    and employment with the fire department of an affected 9    department providing emergency medical services.10        (5) Experience preference. All persons employed by a 11    municipality who have been paid-on-call or part-time 12    certified Firefighter II, certified Firefighter III, State 13    of Illinois or nationally licensed EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, or 14    paramedic, or any combination of those capacities may be 15    awarded up to a maximum of 5 points. However, the 16    applicant may not be awarded more than 0.5 points for each 17    complete year of paid-on-call or part-time service. 18    Applicants from outside the municipality who were employed 19    as full-time firefighters or firefighter-paramedics by a 20    fire protection district or another municipality may be 21    awarded up to 5 experience preference points. However, the 22    applicant may not be awarded more than one point for each 23    complete year of full-time service.24        Upon request by the commission, the governing body of 25    the municipality or in the case of applicants from outside 26    the municipality the governing body of any fire protection   HB1647- 15 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1    district or any other municipality shall certify to the 2    commission, within 10 days after the request, the number 3    of years of successful paid-on-call, part-time, or 4    full-time service of any person. A candidate may not 5    receive the full amount of preference points under this 6    subsection if the amount of points awarded would place the 7    candidate before a veteran on the eligibility list. If 8    more than one candidate receiving experience preference 9    points is prevented from receiving all of their points due 10    to not being allowed to pass a veteran, the candidates 11    shall be placed on the list below the veteran in rank order 12    based on the totals received if all points under this 13    subsection were to be awarded. Any remaining ties on the 14    list shall be determined by lot. 15        (6) Residency preference. Applicants whose principal 16    residence is located within the fire department's 17    jurisdiction may be preferred for appointment to and 18    employment with the fire department.19        (7) Additional preferences. Up to 5 additional 20    preference points may be awarded for unique categories 21    based on an applicant's experience or background as 22    identified by the commission.23        (7.5) Apprentice preferences. A person who has 24    performed fire suppression service for a department as a 25    firefighter apprentice and otherwise meets the 26    qualifications for original appointment as a firefighter   HB1647- 16 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1    specified in this Section may be awarded up to 20 2    preference points. To qualify for preference points, an 3    applicant shall have completed a minimum of 600 hours of 4    fire suppression work on a regular shift for the affected 5    fire department over a 12-month period. The fire 6    suppression work must be in accordance with Section 7    10-1-14 of this Division and the terms established by a 8    Joint Apprenticeship Committee included in a collective 9    bargaining agreement agreed between the employer and its 10    certified bargaining agent. An eligible applicant must 11    apply to the Joint Apprenticeship Committee for preference 12    points under this item. The Joint Apprenticeship Committee 13    shall evaluate the merit of the applicant's performance, 14    determine the preference points to be awarded, and certify 15    the amount of points awarded to the commissioners. The 16    commissioners may add the certified preference points to 17    the final grades achieved by the applicant on the other 18    components of the examination. 19        (8) Scoring of preferences. The commission shall give 20    preference for original appointment to persons designated 21    in item (1) by adding to the final grade that they receive 22    5 points for the recognized preference achieved. The 23    commission may give preference for original appointment to 24    persons designated in item (7.5) by adding to the final 25    grade the amount of points designated by the Joint 26    Apprenticeship Committee as defined in item (7.5). The   HB1647- 17 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1    commission shall determine the number of preference points 2    for each category, except items (1) and (7.5). The number 3    of preference points for each category shall range from 0 4    to 5, except item (7.5). In determining the number of 5    preference points, the commission shall prescribe that if 6    a candidate earns the maximum number of preference points 7    in all categories except item (7.5), that number may not 8    be less than 10 nor more than 30. The commission shall give 9    preference for original appointment to persons designated 10    in items (2) through (7) by adding the requisite number of 11    points to the final grade for each recognized preference 12    achieved. The numerical result thus attained shall be 13    applied by the commission in determining the final 14    eligibility list and appointment from the eligibility 15    list. The local appointing authority may prescribe the 16    total number of preference points awarded under this 17    Section, but the total number of preference points, except 18    item (7.5), shall not be less than 10 points or more than 19    30 points. Apprentice preference points may be added in 20    addition to other preference points awarded by the 21    commission. 22    No person entitled to any preference shall be required to 23claim the credit before any examination held under the 24provisions of this Section, but the preference shall be given 25after the posting or publication of the initial eligibility 26list or register at the request of a person entitled to a   HB1647- 18 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1credit before any certification or appointments are made from 2the eligibility register, upon the furnishing of verifiable 3evidence and proof of qualifying preference credit. Candidates 4who are eligible for preference credit shall make a claim in 5writing within 10 days after the posting of the initial 6eligibility list, or the claim shall be deemed waived. Final 7eligibility registers shall be established after the awarding 8of verified preference points. However, apprentice preference 9credit earned subsequent to the establishment of the final 10eligibility register may be applied to the applicant's score 11upon certification by the Joint Apprenticeship Committee to 12the commission and the rank order of candidates on the final 13eligibility register shall be adjusted accordingly. All 14employment shall be subject to the commission's initial hire 15background review, including, but not limited to, criminal 16history, employment history, moral character, oral 17examination, and medical and psychological examinations, all 18on a pass-fail basis. The medical and psychological 19examinations must be conducted last, and may only be performed 20after a conditional offer of employment has been extended.21    Any person placed on an eligibility list who exceeds the 22age requirement before being appointed to a fire department 23shall remain eligible for appointment until the list is 24abolished, or his or her name has been on the list for a period 25of 2 years. No person who has attained the age of 35 years 26shall be inducted into a fire department, except as otherwise   HB1647- 19 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1provided in this Section.2    The commission shall strike off the names of candidates 3for original appointment after the names have been on the list 4for more than 2 years.5    (i) Moral character. No person shall be appointed to a 6fire department unless he or she is a person of good character; 7not a habitual drunkard, a gambler, or a person who has been 8convicted of a felony or a crime involving moral turpitude. 9However, no person shall be disqualified from appointment to 10the fire department because of the person's record of 11misdemeanor convictions except those under Sections 11-6, 1211-7, 11-9, 11-14, 11-15, 11-17, 11-18, 11-19, 12-2, 12-6, 1312-15, 14-4, 16-1, 21.1-3, 24-3.1, 24-5, 25-1, 28-3, 31-1, 1431-4, 31-6, 31-7, 32-1, 32-2, 32-3, 32-4, 32-8, and paragraphs 15(1), (6), and (8) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1 of the 16Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or arrest 17for any cause without conviction thereon. Any such person who 18is in the department may be removed on charges brought for 19violating this subsection and after a trial as hereinafter 20provided.21    A classifiable set of the fingerprints of every person who 22is offered employment as a certificated member of an affected 23fire department whether with or without compensation, shall be 24furnished to the Illinois State Police and to the Federal 25Bureau of Investigation by the commission.26    Whenever a commission is authorized or required by law to   HB1647- 20 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1consider some aspect of criminal history record information 2for the purpose of carrying out its statutory powers and 3responsibilities, then, upon request and payment of fees in 4conformance with the requirements of Section 2605-400 of the 5Illinois State Police Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 6Illinois, the Illinois State Police is authorized to furnish, 7pursuant to positive identification, the information contained 8in State files as is necessary to fulfill the request.9    (j) Temporary appointments. In order to prevent a stoppage 10of public business, to meet extraordinary exigencies, or to 11prevent material impairment of the fire department, the 12commission may make temporary appointments, to remain in force 13only until regular appointments are made under the provisions 14of this Division, but never to exceed 60 days. No temporary 15appointment of any one person shall be made more than twice in 16any calendar year.17    (k) A person who knowingly divulges or receives test 18questions or answers before a written examination, or 19otherwise knowingly violates or subverts any requirement of 20this Section, commits a violation of this Section and may be 21subject to charges for official misconduct.22    A person who is the knowing recipient of test information 23in advance of the examination shall be disqualified from the 24examination or discharged from the position to which he or she 25was appointed, as applicable, and otherwise subjected to 26disciplinary actions.  HB1647- 21 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1(Source: P.A. 101-489, eff. 8-23-19; 102-375, eff. 8-13-21; 2102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 35-13-22.) 4    (65 ILCS 5/10-1-7.2)5    Sec. 10-1-7.2. Alternative procedure; original 6appointment; full-time firefighter.7    (a) Authority. The Joint Labor and Management Committee 8(JLMC), as defined in Section 50 of the Fire Department 9Promotion Act, may establish a community outreach program to 10market the profession of firefighter and firefighter-paramedic 11so as to ensure the pool of applicants recruited is of broad 12diversity and the highest quality. Nothing in this Section 13requires that the Joint Labor and Management Committee 14establish or operate the community outreach program or master 15register of eligibles, or to contract with a testing agency to 16establish or operate such program or register, unless the 17Joint Labor and Management Committee chooses to do so. 18    For the purposes of this Section, "firefighter" means any 19person who has been prior to, on, or after the effective date 20of this amendatory Act of the 97th General Assembly appointed 21to a fire department or fire protection district, or employed 22by a State university, unit of local government, or Emergency 23Medical Services (EMS) System, and sworn or commissioned or 24employed to perform (i) firefighter duties, (ii) or paramedic, 25emergency medical technician (EMT), emergency medical   HB1647- 22 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1technician-basic (EMT-B), emergency medical 2technician-intermediate (EMT-I), or advanced emergency medical 3technician (A-EMT) duties, (iii) or both, except that the 4following persons are not included: part-time firefighters; 5auxiliary, reserve, or voluntary firefighters, including 6paid-on-call firefighters; clerks and dispatchers or other 7civilian employees of a fire department or fire protection 8district who are not routinely expected to perform firefighter 9duties; and elected officials.10    (b) Eligibility. Persons eligible for placement on the 11master register of eligibles shall consist of the following:12        Persons who have participated in and received a 13    passing total score on the mental aptitude, physical 14    ability, and preference components of a regionally 15    administered test based on the standards described in this 16    Section. The standards for administering these tests and 17    the minimum passing score required for placement on this 18    list shall be as is set forth in this Section.19        Qualified candidates shall be listed on the master 20    register of eligibles in highest to lowest rank order 21    based upon their test scores without regard to their date 22    of examination. Candidates listed on the master register 23    of eligibles shall be eligible for appointment for 2 years 24    after the date of the certification of their final score 25    on the register without regard to the date of their 26    examination. After 2 years, the candidate's name shall be   HB1647- 23 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1    struck from the list.2        Any person currently employed as a full-time member of 3    a fire department or any person who has experienced a 4    non-voluntary (and non-disciplinary) separation from the 5    active workforce due to a reduction in the number of 6    departmental officers, who was appointed pursuant to this 7    Division, Division 2.1 of Article 10 of the Illinois 8    Municipal Code, or the Fire Protection District Act, and 9    who during the previous 24 months participated in and 10    received a passing score on the physical ability and 11    mental aptitude components of the test may request that 12    his or her name be added to the master register. Any 13    eligible person may be offered employment by a local 14    commission under the same procedures as provided by this 15    Section except that the apprenticeship period may be 16    waived and the applicant may be immediately issued a 17    certificate of original appointment by the local 18    commission.19    (c) Qualifications for placement on register of eligibles. 20The purpose for establishing a master register of eligibles 21shall be to identify applicants who possess and demonstrate 22the mental aptitude and physical ability to perform the duties 23required of members of the fire department in order to provide 24the highest quality of service to the public. To this end, all 25applicants for original appointment to an affected fire 26department through examination conducted by the Joint Labor   HB1647- 24 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1and Management Committee (JLMC) shall be subject to 2examination and testing which shall be public, competitive, 3and open to all applicants. Any examination and testing 4procedure utilized under subsection (e) of this Section shall 5be supported by appropriate validation evidence and shall 6comply with all applicable state and federal laws. Any 7subjective component of the testing must be administered by 8certified assessors. All qualifying and disqualifying factors 9applicable to examination processes for local commissions in 10this amendatory Act of the 97th General Assembly shall be 11applicable to persons participating in Joint Labor and 12Management Committee examinations unless specifically provided 13otherwise in this Section.14    Notice of the time, place, general scope, and fee of every 15JLMC examination shall be given by the JLMC or designated 16testing agency, as applicable, by publication at least 30 days 17preceding the examination, in one or more newspapers published 18in the region, or if no newspaper is published therein, then in 19one or more newspapers with a general circulation within the 20region. The JLMC may publish the notice on the JLMC's Internet 21website. Additional notice of the examination may be given as 22the JLMC shall prescribe.23    (d) Examination and testing components for placement on 24register of eligibles. The examination and qualifying 25standards for placement on the master register of eligibles 26and employment shall be based on the following components:   HB1647- 25 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1mental aptitude, physical ability, preferences, moral 2character, and health. The mental aptitude, physical ability, 3and preference components shall determine an applicant's 4qualification for and placement on the master register of 5eligibles. The consideration of an applicant's general moral 6character and health shall be administered on a pass-fail 7basis after a conditional offer of employment is made by a 8local commission.9    (e) Mental aptitude. Examination of an applicant's mental 10aptitude shall be based upon written examination and an 11applicant's prior experience demonstrating an aptitude for and 12commitment to service as a member of a fire department. 13Written examinations shall be practical in character and 14relate to those matters that fairly test the capacity of the 15persons examined to discharge the duties performed by members 16of a fire department. Written examinations shall be 17administered in a manner that ensures the security and 18accuracy of the scores achieved. Any subjective component of 19the testing must be administered by certified assessors. No 20person who does not possess a high school diploma or an 21equivalent high school education shall be placed on a register 22of eligibles. Local commissions may establish educational, 23emergency medical service licensure, and other pre-requisites 24for hire within their jurisdiction.25    (f) Physical ability. All candidates shall be required to 26undergo an examination of their physical ability to perform   HB1647- 26 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1the essential functions included in the duties they may be 2called upon to perform as a member of a fire department. For 3the purposes of this Section, essential functions of the job 4are functions associated with duties that a firefighter may be 5called upon to perform in response to emergency calls. The 6frequency of the occurrence of those duties as part of the fire 7department's regular routine shall not be a controlling factor 8in the design of examination criteria or evolutions selected 9for testing. These physical examinations shall be open, 10competitive, and based on industry standards designed to test 11each applicant's physical abilities in each of the following 12dimensions:13        (1) Muscular strength to perform tasks and evolutions 14    that may be required in the performance of duties 15    including grip strength, leg strength, and arm strength. 16    Tests shall be conducted under anaerobic as well as 17    aerobic conditions to test both the candidate's speed and 18    endurance in performing tasks and evolutions. Tasks tested 19    are to be based on industry standards developed by the 20    JLMC by rule.21        (2) The ability to climb ladders, operate from 22    heights, walk or crawl in the dark along narrow and uneven 23    surfaces, and operate in proximity to hazardous 24    environments.25        (3) The ability to carry out critical, time-sensitive, 26    and complex problem solving during physical exertion in   HB1647- 27 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1    stressful and hazardous environments. The testing 2    environment may be hot and dark with tightly enclosed 3    spaces, flashing lights, sirens, and other distractions.4    The tests utilized to measure each applicant's 5capabilities in each of these dimensions may be tests based on 6industry standards currently in use or equivalent tests 7approved by the Joint Labor-Management Committee of the Office 8of the State Fire Marshal. 9    (g) Scoring of examination components. The examination 10components shall be graded on a 100-point scale. A person's 11position on the master register of eligibles shall be 12determined by the person's score on the written examination, 13the person successfully passing the physical ability 14component, and the addition of any applicable preference 15points.16    Applicants who have achieved at least the minimum score on 17the written examination, as set by the JLMC, and who 18successfully pass the physical ability examination shall be 19placed on the initial eligibility register. Minimum scores 20should be set by the JLMC so as to demonstrate a candidate's 21ability to perform the essential functions of the job. The 22minimum score set by the JLMC shall be supported by 23appropriate validation evidence and shall comply with all 24applicable State and federal laws. Applicable preference 25points shall be added to the written examination scores for 26all applicants who qualify for the initial eligibility   HB1647- 28 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1register. Applicants who score at or above the minimum passing 2score as set by the JLMC, including any applicable preference 3points, shall be placed on the master register of eligibles by 4the JLMC.5    These persons shall take rank upon the register as 6candidates in the order of their relative excellence based on 7the highest to the lowest total points scored on the mental 8aptitude and physical ability components, plus any applicable 9preference points requested and verified by the JLMC, or 10approved testing agency.11    No more than 60 days after each examination, a revised 12master register of eligibles shall be posted by the JLMC 13showing the final grades of the candidates without reference 14to priority of time of examination.15    (h) Preferences. The board shall give military, education, 16and experience preference points to those who qualify for 17placement on the master register of eligibles, on the same 18basis as provided for examinations administered by a local 19commission.20    No person entitled to preference or credit shall be 21required to claim the credit before any examination held under 22the provisions of this Section. The preference shall be given 23after the posting or publication of the applicant's initial 24score at the request of the person before finalizing the 25scores from all applicants taking part in a JLMC examination. 26Candidates who are eligible for preference credit shall make a   HB1647- 29 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1claim in writing within 10 days after the posting of the 2initial scores from any JLMC test or the claim shall be deemed 3waived. Once preference points are awarded, the candidates 4shall be certified to the master register in accordance with 5their final score including preference points.6    (i) Firefighter apprentice and firefighter-paramedic 7apprentice. The employment of an applicant to an apprentice 8position (including a currently employed full-time member of a 9fire department whose apprenticeship may be reduced or waived) 10shall be subject to the applicant passing the moral character 11standards and health examinations of the local commission. In 12addition, a local commission may require as a condition of 13employment that the applicant demonstrate current physical 14ability by either passing the local commission's approved 15physical ability examination, or by presenting proof of 16participating in and receiving a passing score on the physical 17ability component of a JLMC test within a period of up to 12 18months before the date of the conditional offer of employment. 19Applicants shall be subject to the local commission's initial 20hire background review including criminal history, employment 21history, moral character, oral examination, and medical 22examinations which may include polygraph, psychological, and 23drug screening components, all on a pass-fail basis. The 24medical examinations must be conducted last, and may only be 25performed after a conditional offer of employment has been 26extended.  HB1647- 30 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1    (j) Selection from list. Any municipality or fire 2protection district that is a party to an intergovernmental 3agreement under the terms of which persons have been tested 4for placement on the master register of eligibles shall be 5entitled to offer employment to any person on the list 6irrespective of their ranking on the list. The offer of 7employment shall be to the position of firefighter apprentice 8or firefighter-paramedic apprentice.9    Applicants passing these tests may be employed as a 10firefighter apprentice or a firefighter-paramedic apprentice 11who shall serve an apprenticeship period of 12 months or less 12according to the terms and conditions of employment as the 13employing municipality or district offers, or as provided for 14under the terms of any collective bargaining agreement then in 15effect. The apprenticeship period is separate from the 16probationary period.17    Service during the apprenticeship period shall be on a 18probationary basis. During the apprenticeship period, the 19apprentice's training and performance shall be monitored and 20evaluated by a Joint Apprenticeship Committee.21    The Joint Apprenticeship Committee shall consist of 4 22members who shall be regular members of the fire department 23with at least 10 years of full-time work experience as a 24firefighter or firefighter-paramedic. The fire chief and the 25president of the exclusive bargaining representative 26recognized by the employer shall each appoint 2 members to the   HB1647- 31 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1Joint Apprenticeship Committee. In the absence of an exclusive 2collective bargaining representative, the chief shall appoint 3the remaining 2 members who shall be from the ranks of company 4officer and firefighter with at least 10 years of work 5experience as a firefighter or firefighter-paramedic. In the 6absence of a sufficient number of qualified firefighters, the 7Joint Apprenticeship Committee members shall have the amount 8of experience and the type of qualifications as is reasonable 9given the circumstances of the fire department. In the absence 10of a full-time member in a rank between chief and the highest 11rank in a bargaining unit, the Joint Apprenticeship Committee 12shall be reduced to 2 members, one to be appointed by the chief 13and one by the union president, if any. If there is no 14exclusive bargaining representative, the chief shall appoint 15the second member of the Joint Apprenticeship Committee from 16among qualified members in the ranks of company officer and 17below. Before the conclusion of the apprenticeship period, the 18Joint Apprenticeship Committee shall meet to consider the 19apprentice's progress and performance and vote to retain the 20apprentice as a member of the fire department or to terminate 21the apprenticeship. If 3 of the 4 members of the Joint 22Apprenticeship Committee affirmatively vote to retain the 23apprentice (if a 2 member Joint Apprenticeship Committee 24exists, then both members must affirmatively vote to retain 25the apprentice), the local commission shall issue the 26apprentice a certificate of original appointment to the fire   HB1647- 32 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1department.2    (k) A person who knowingly divulges or receives test 3questions or answers before a written examination, or 4otherwise knowingly violates or subverts any requirement of 5this Section, commits a violation of this Section and may be 6subject to charges for official misconduct.7    A person who is the knowing recipient of test information 8in advance of the examination shall be disqualified from the 9examination or discharged from the position to which he or she 10was appointed, as applicable, and otherwise subjected to 11disciplinary actions.12    (l) Applicability. This Section does not apply to a 13municipality with more than 1,000,000 inhabitants. 14(Source: P.A. 102-188, eff. 1-1-22.) 15    (65 ILCS 5/10-2.1-6.3)16    Sec. 10-2.1-6.3. Original appointments; full-time fire 17department.18    (a) Applicability. Unless a commission elects to follow 19the provisions of Section 10-2.1-6.4, this Section shall apply 20to all original appointments to an affected full-time fire 21department. Existing registers of eligibles shall continue to 22be valid until their expiration dates, or up to a maximum of 2 23years after August 4, 2011 (the effective date of Public Act 2497-251).25    Notwithstanding any statute, ordinance, rule, or other law   HB1647- 33 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1to the contrary, all original appointments to an affected 2department to which this Section applies shall be administered 3in the manner provided for in this Section. Provisions of the 4Illinois Municipal Code, municipal ordinances, and rules 5adopted pursuant to such authority and other laws relating to 6initial hiring of firefighters in affected departments shall 7continue to apply to the extent they are compatible with this 8Section, but in the event of a conflict between this Section 9and any other law, this Section shall control.10    A home rule or non-home rule municipality may not 11administer its fire department process for original 12appointments in a manner that is less stringent than this 13Section. This Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of 14Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 15concurrent exercise by home rule units of the powers and 16functions exercised by the State.17    A municipality that is operating under a court order or 18consent decree regarding original appointments to a full-time 19fire department before August 4, 2011 (the effective date of 20Public Act 97-251) is exempt from the requirements of this 21Section for the duration of the court order or consent decree.22    Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection 23(a), this Section does not apply to a municipality with more 24than 1,000,000 inhabitants. 25    (b) Original appointments. All original appointments made 26to an affected fire department shall be made from a register of   HB1647- 34 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1eligibles established in accordance with the processes 2established by this Section. Only persons who meet or exceed 3the performance standards required by this Section shall be 4placed on a register of eligibles for original appointment to 5an affected fire department.6    Whenever an appointing authority authorizes action to hire 7a person to perform the duties of a firefighter or to hire a 8firefighter-paramedic to fill a position that is a new 9position or vacancy due to resignation, discharge, promotion, 10death, the granting of a disability or retirement pension, or 11any other cause, the appointing authority shall appoint to 12that position the person with the highest ranking on the final 13eligibility list. If the appointing authority has reason to 14conclude that the highest ranked person fails to meet the 15minimum standards for the position or if the appointing 16authority believes an alternate candidate would better serve 17the needs of the department, then the appointing authority has 18the right to pass over the highest ranked person and appoint 19either: (i) any person who has a ranking in the top 5% of the 20register of eligibles or (ii) any person who is among the top 5 21highest ranked persons on the list of eligibles if the number 22of people who have a ranking in the top 5% of the register of 23eligibles is less than 5 people.24    Any candidate may pass on an appointment once without 25losing his or her position on the register of eligibles. Any 26candidate who passes a second time may be removed from the list   HB1647- 35 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1by the appointing authority provided that such action shall 2not prejudice a person's opportunities to participate in 3future examinations, including an examination held during the 4time a candidate is already on the municipality's register of 5eligibles.6    The sole authority to issue certificates of appointment 7shall be vested in the board of fire and police commissioners. 8All certificates of appointment issued to any officer or 9member of an affected department shall be signed by the 10chairperson and secretary, respectively, of the board upon 11appointment of such officer or member to the affected 12department by action of the board. After being selected from 13the register of eligibles to fill a vacancy in the affected 14department, each appointee shall be presented with his or her 15certificate of appointment on the day on which he or she is 16sworn in as a classified member of the affected department. 17Firefighters who were not issued a certificate of appointment 18when originally appointed shall be provided with a certificate 19within 10 days after making a written request to the 20chairperson of the board of fire and police commissioners. 21Each person who accepts a certificate of appointment and 22successfully completes his or her probationary period shall be 23enrolled as a firefighter and as a regular member of the fire 24department.25    For the purposes of this Section, "firefighter" means any 26person who has been prior to, on, or after August 4, 2011 (the   HB1647- 36 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1effective date of Public Act 97-251) appointed to a fire 2department or fire protection district, or employed by a State 3university, unit of local government, or Emergency Medical 4Services (EMS) System, and sworn or commissioned or employed 5to perform (i) firefighter duties, (ii) or paramedic, 6emergency medical technician (EMT), emergency medical 7technician-basic (EMT-B), emergency medical 8technician-intermediate (EMT-I), or advanced emergency medical 9technician (A-EMT) duties, (iii) or both, except that the 10following persons are not included: part-time firefighters; 11auxiliary, reserve, or voluntary firefighters, including 12paid-on-call firefighters; clerks and dispatchers or other 13civilian employees of a fire department or fire protection 14district who are not routinely expected to perform firefighter 15duties; and elected officials.16    (c) Qualification for placement on register of eligibles. 17The purpose of establishing a register of eligibles is to 18identify applicants who possess and demonstrate the mental 19aptitude and physical ability to perform the duties required 20of members of the fire department in order to provide the 21highest quality of service to the public. To this end, all 22applicants for original appointment to an affected fire 23department shall be subject to examination and testing which 24shall be public, competitive, and open to all applicants 25unless the municipality shall by ordinance limit applicants to 26residents of the municipality, county or counties in which the   HB1647- 37 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1municipality is located, State, or nation. Any examination and 2testing procedure utilized under subsection (e) of this 3Section shall be supported by appropriate validation evidence 4and shall comply with all applicable State and federal laws. 5Municipalities may establish educational, emergency medical 6service licensure, and other prerequisites for participation 7in an examination or for hire as a firefighter. Any 8municipality may charge a fee to cover the costs of the 9application process.10    Residency requirements in effect at the time an individual 11enters the fire service of a municipality cannot be made more 12restrictive for that individual during his or her period of 13service for that municipality, or be made a condition of 14promotion, except for the rank or position of fire chief and 15for no more than 2 positions that rank immediately below that 16of the chief rank which are appointed positions pursuant to 17the Fire Department Promotion Act.18    No person who is 35 years of age or older shall be eligible 19to take an examination for a position as a firefighter unless 20the person has had previous employment status as a firefighter 21in the regularly constituted fire department of the 22municipality, except as provided in this Section. The age 23limitation does not apply to:24        (1) any person previously employed as a full-time 25    firefighter in a regularly constituted fire department of 26    (i) any municipality or fire protection district located   HB1647- 38 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1    in Illinois, (ii) a fire protection district whose 2    obligations were assumed by a municipality under Section 3    21 of the Fire Protection District Act, or (iii) a 4    municipality whose obligations were taken over by a fire 5    protection district,6        (2) any person who has served a municipality as a 7    regularly enrolled volunteer, paid-on-call, or part-time 8    firefighter, or9        (3) any person who turned 35 while serving as a member 10    of the active or reserve components of any of the branches 11    of the Armed Forces of the United States or the National 12    Guard of any state, whose service was characterized as 13    honorable or under honorable, if separated from the 14    military, and is currently under the age of 40. 15    No person who is under 21 years of age shall be eligible 16for employment as a firefighter.17    No applicant shall be examined concerning his or her 18political or religious opinions or affiliations. The 19examinations shall be conducted by the commissioners of the 20municipality or their designees and agents.21    No municipality shall require that any firefighter 22appointed to the lowest rank serve a probationary employment 23period of longer than one year of actual active employment, 24which may exclude periods of training, or injury or illness 25leaves, including duty related leave, in excess of 30 calendar 26days. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this   HB1647- 39 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1Section, the probationary employment period limitation may be 2extended for a firefighter who is required, as a condition of 3employment, to be a licensed paramedic, during which time the 4sole reason that a firefighter may be discharged without a 5hearing is for failing to meet the requirements for paramedic 6licensure.7    In the event that any applicant who has been found 8eligible for appointment and whose name has been placed upon 9the final eligibility register provided for in this Section 10has not been appointed to a firefighter position within one 11year after the date of his or her physical ability 12examination, the commission may cause a second examination to 13be made of that applicant's physical ability prior to his or 14her appointment. If, after the second examination, the 15physical ability of the applicant shall be found to be less 16than the minimum standard fixed by the rules of the 17commission, the applicant shall not be appointed. The 18applicant's name may be retained upon the register of 19candidates eligible for appointment and when next reached for 20certification and appointment that applicant may be again 21examined as provided in this Section, and if the physical 22ability of that applicant is found to be less than the minimum 23standard fixed by the rules of the commission, the applicant 24shall not be appointed, and the name of the applicant shall be 25removed from the register.26    (d) Notice, examination, and testing components. Notice of   HB1647- 40 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1the time, place, general scope, merit criteria for any 2subjective component, and fee of every examination shall be 3given by the commission, by a publication at least 2 weeks 4preceding the examination: (i) in one or more newspapers 5published in the municipality, or if no newspaper is published 6therein, then in one or more newspapers with a general 7circulation within the municipality, or (ii) on the 8municipality's Internet website. Additional notice of the 9examination may be given as the commission shall prescribe.10    The examination and qualifying standards for employment of 11firefighters shall be based on: mental aptitude, physical 12ability, preferences, moral character, and health. The mental 13aptitude, physical ability, and preference components shall 14determine an applicant's qualification for and placement on 15the final register of eligibles. The examination may also 16include a subjective component based on merit criteria as 17determined by the commission. Scores from the examination must 18be made available to the public.19    (e) Mental aptitude. No person who does not possess at 20least a high school diploma or an equivalent high school 21education shall be placed on a register of eligibles. 22Examination of an applicant's mental aptitude shall be based 23upon a written examination. The examination shall be practical 24in character and relate to those matters that fairly test the 25capacity of the persons examined to discharge the duties 26performed by members of a fire department. Written   HB1647- 41 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1examinations shall be administered in a manner that ensures 2the security and accuracy of the scores achieved.3    (f) Physical ability. All candidates shall be required to 4undergo an examination of their physical ability to perform 5the essential functions included in the duties they may be 6called upon to perform as a member of a fire department. For 7the purposes of this Section, essential functions of the job 8are functions associated with duties that a firefighter may be 9called upon to perform in response to emergency calls. The 10frequency of the occurrence of those duties as part of the fire 11department's regular routine shall not be a controlling factor 12in the design of examination criteria or evolutions selected 13for testing. These physical examinations shall be open, 14competitive, and based on industry standards designed to test 15each applicant's physical abilities in the following 16dimensions:17        (1) Muscular strength to perform tasks and evolutions 18    that may be required in the performance of duties 19    including grip strength, leg strength, and arm strength. 20    Tests shall be conducted under anaerobic as well as 21    aerobic conditions to test both the candidate's speed and 22    endurance in performing tasks and evolutions. Tasks tested 23    may be based on standards developed, or approved, by the 24    local appointing authority.25        (2) The ability to climb ladders, operate from 26    heights, walk or crawl in the dark along narrow and uneven   HB1647- 42 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1    surfaces, and operate in proximity to hazardous 2    environments.3        (3) The ability to carry out critical, time-sensitive, 4    and complex problem solving during physical exertion in 5    stressful and hazardous environments. The testing 6    environment may be hot and dark with tightly enclosed 7    spaces, flashing lights, sirens, and other distractions.8    The tests utilized to measure each applicant's 9capabilities in each of these dimensions may be tests based on 10industry standards currently in use or equivalent tests 11approved by the Joint Labor-Management Committee of the Office 12of the State Fire Marshal. 13    Physical ability examinations administered under this 14Section shall be conducted with a reasonable number of 15proctors and monitors, open to the public, and subject to 16reasonable regulations of the commission.17    (g) Scoring of examination components. Appointing 18authorities may create a preliminary eligibility register. A 19person shall be placed on the list based upon his or her 20passage of the written examination or the passage of the 21written examination and the physical ability component. 22Passage of the written examination means attaining the minimum 23score set by the commission. Minimum scores should be set by 24the commission so as to demonstrate a candidate's ability to 25perform the essential functions of the job. The minimum score 26set by the commission shall be supported by appropriate   HB1647- 43 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1validation evidence and shall comply with all applicable State 2and federal laws. The appointing authority may conduct the 3physical ability component and any subjective components 4subsequent to the posting of the preliminary eligibility 5register.6    The examination components for an initial eligibility 7register shall be graded on a 100-point scale. A person's 8position on the list shall be determined by the following: (i) 9the person's score on the written examination, (ii) the person 10successfully passing the physical ability component, and (iii) 11the person's results on any subjective component as described 12in subsection (d). 13    In order to qualify for placement on the final eligibility 14register, an applicant's score on the written examination, 15before any applicable preference points or subjective points 16are applied, shall be at or above the minimum score as set by 17the commission. The local appointing authority may prescribe 18the score to qualify for placement on the final eligibility 19register, but the score shall not be less than the minimum 20score set by the commission.21    The commission shall prepare and keep a register of 22persons whose total score is not less than the minimum score 23for passage and who have passed the physical ability 24examination. These persons shall take rank upon the register 25as candidates in the order of their relative excellence based 26on the highest to the lowest total points scored on the mental   HB1647- 44 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1aptitude, subjective component, and preference components of 2the test administered in accordance with this Section. No more 3than 60 days after each examination, an initial eligibility 4list shall be posted by the commission. The list shall include 5the final grades of the candidates without reference to 6priority of the time of examination and subject to claim for 7preference credit.8    Commissions may conduct additional examinations, including 9without limitation a polygraph test, after a final eligibility 10register is established and before it expires with the 11candidates ranked by total score without regard to date of 12examination. No more than 60 days after each examination, an 13initial eligibility list shall be posted by the commission 14showing the final grades of the candidates without reference 15to priority of time of examination and subject to claim for 16preference credit.17    (h) Preferences. The following are preferences:18        (1) Veteran preference. Persons who were engaged in 19    the military service of the United States for a period of 20    at least one year of active duty and who were honorably 21    discharged therefrom, or who are now or have been members 22    on inactive or reserve duty in such military or naval 23    service, shall be preferred for appointment to and 24    employment with the fire department of an affected 25    department.26        (2) Fire cadet preference. Persons who have   HB1647- 45 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1    successfully completed 2 years of study in fire techniques 2    or cadet training within a cadet program established under 3    the rules of the Joint Labor and Management Committee 4    (JLMC), as defined in Section 50 of the Fire Department 5    Promotion Act, may be preferred for appointment to and 6    employment with the fire department.7        (3) Educational preference. Persons who have 8    successfully obtained an associate's degree in the field 9    of fire service or emergency medical services, or a 10    bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university 11    may be preferred for appointment to and employment with 12    the fire department.13        (4) Paramedic preference. Persons who have obtained a 14    license as a paramedic shall be preferred for appointment 15    to and employment with the fire department of an affected 16    department providing emergency medical services.17        (5) Experience preference. All persons employed by a 18    municipality who have been paid-on-call or part-time 19    certified Firefighter II, State of Illinois or nationally 20    licensed EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, or any combination of those 21    capacities shall be awarded 0.5 point for each year of 22    successful service in one or more of those capacities, up 23    to a maximum of 5 points. Certified Firefighter III and 24    State of Illinois or nationally licensed paramedics shall 25    be awarded one point per year up to a maximum of 5 points. 26    Applicants from outside the municipality who were employed   HB1647- 46 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1    as full-time firefighters or firefighter-paramedics by a 2    fire protection district or another municipality for at 3    least 2 years shall be awarded 5 experience preference 4    points. These additional points presuppose a rating scale 5    totaling 100 points available for the eligibility list. If 6    more or fewer points are used in the rating scale for the 7    eligibility list, the points awarded under this subsection 8    shall be increased or decreased by a factor equal to the 9    total possible points available for the examination 10    divided by 100.11        Upon request by the commission, the governing body of 12    the municipality or in the case of applicants from outside 13    the municipality the governing body of any fire protection 14    district or any other municipality shall certify to the 15    commission, within 10 days after the request, the number 16    of years of successful paid-on-call, part-time, or 17    full-time service of any person. A candidate may not 18    receive the full amount of preference points under this 19    subsection if the amount of points awarded would place the 20    candidate before a veteran on the eligibility list. If 21    more than one candidate receiving experience preference 22    points is prevented from receiving all of their points due 23    to not being allowed to pass a veteran, the candidates 24    shall be placed on the list below the veteran in rank order 25    based on the totals received if all points under this 26    subsection were to be awarded. Any remaining ties on the   HB1647- 47 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1    list shall be determined by lot. 2        (6) Residency preference. Applicants whose principal 3    residence is located within the fire department's 4    jurisdiction shall be preferred for appointment to and 5    employment with the fire department.6        (7) Additional preferences. Up to 5 additional 7    preference points may be awarded for unique categories 8    based on an applicant's experience or background as 9    identified by the commission.10        (7.5) Apprentice preferences. A person who has 11    performed fire suppression service for a department as a 12    firefighter apprentice and otherwise meets the 13    qualifications for original appointment as a firefighter 14    specified in this Section is eligible to be awarded up to 15    20 preference points. To qualify for preference points, an 16    applicant shall have completed a minimum of 600 hours of 17    fire suppression work on a regular shift for the affected 18    fire department over a 12-month period. The fire 19    suppression work must be in accordance with Section 20    10-2.1-4 of this Division and the terms established by a 21    Joint Apprenticeship Committee included in a collective 22    bargaining agreement agreed between the employer and its 23    certified bargaining agent. An eligible applicant must 24    apply to the Joint Apprenticeship Committee for preference 25    points under this item. The Joint Apprenticeship Committee 26    shall evaluate the merit of the applicant's performance,   HB1647- 48 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1    determine the preference points to be awarded, and certify 2    the amount of points awarded to the commissioners. The 3    commissioners may add the certified preference points to 4    the final grades achieved by the applicant on the other 5    components of the examination. 6        (8) Scoring of preferences. The commission may give 7    preference for original appointment to persons designated 8    in item (1) by adding to the final grade that they receive 9    5 points for the recognized preference achieved. The 10    commission may give preference for original appointment to 11    persons designated in item (7.5) by adding to the final 12    grade the amount of points designated by the Joint 13    Apprenticeship Committee as defined in item (7.5). The 14    commission shall determine the number of preference points 15    for each category, except items (1) and (7.5). The number 16    of preference points for each category shall range from 0 17    to 5, except item (7.5). In determining the number of 18    preference points, the commission shall prescribe that if 19    a candidate earns the maximum number of preference points 20    in all categories except item (7.5), that number may not 21    be less than 10 nor more than 30. The commission shall give 22    preference for original appointment to persons designated 23    in items (2) through (7) by adding the requisite number of 24    points to the final grade for each recognized preference 25    achieved. The numerical result thus attained shall be 26    applied by the commission in determining the final   HB1647- 49 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1    eligibility list and appointment from the eligibility 2    list. The local appointing authority may prescribe the 3    total number of preference points awarded under this 4    Section, but the total number of preference points, except 5    item (7.5), shall not be less than 10 points or more than 6    30 points. Apprentice preference points may be added in 7    addition to other preference points awarded by the 8    commission. 9    No person entitled to any preference shall be required to 10claim the credit before any examination held under the 11provisions of this Section, but the preference may be given 12after the posting or publication of the initial eligibility 13list or register at the request of a person entitled to a 14credit before any certification or appointments are made from 15the eligibility register, upon the furnishing of verifiable 16evidence and proof of qualifying preference credit. Candidates 17who are eligible for preference credit may make a claim in 18writing within 10 days after the posting of the initial 19eligibility list, or the claim may be deemed waived. Final 20eligibility registers may be established after the awarding of 21verified preference points. However, apprentice preference 22credit earned subsequent to the establishment of the final 23eligibility register may be applied to the applicant's score 24upon certification by the Joint Apprenticeship Committee to 25the commission and the rank order of candidates on the final 26eligibility register shall be adjusted accordingly. All   HB1647- 50 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1employment shall be subject to the commission's initial hire 2background review, including, but not limited to, criminal 3history, employment history, moral character, oral 4examination, and medical and psychological examinations, all 5on a pass-fail basis. The medical and psychological 6examinations must be conducted last, and may only be performed 7after a conditional offer of employment has been extended.8    Any person placed on an eligibility list who exceeds the 9age requirement before being appointed to a fire department 10shall remain eligible for appointment until the list is 11abolished, or his or her name has been on the list for a period 12of 2 years. No person who has attained the age of 35 years 13shall be inducted into a fire department, except as otherwise 14provided in this Section.15    The commission shall strike off the names of candidates 16for original appointment after the names have been on the list 17for more than 2 years.18    (i) Moral character. No person shall be appointed to a 19fire department unless he or she is a person of good character; 20not a habitual drunkard, a gambler, or a person who has been 21convicted of a felony or a crime involving moral turpitude. 22However, no person shall be disqualified from appointment to 23the fire department because of the person's record of 24misdemeanor convictions except those under Sections 11-6, 2511-7, 11-9, 11-14, 11-15, 11-17, 11-18, 11-19, 12-2, 12-6, 2612-15, 14-4, 16-1, 21.1-3, 24-3.1, 24-5, 25-1, 28-3, 31-1,   HB1647- 51 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b131-4, 31-6, 31-7, 32-1, 32-2, 32-3, 32-4, 32-8, and paragraphs 2(1), (6), and (8) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1 of the 3Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or arrest 4for any cause without conviction thereon. Any such person who 5is in the department may be removed on charges brought for 6violating this subsection and after a trial as hereinafter 7provided.8    A classifiable set of the fingerprints of every person who 9is offered employment as a certificated member of an affected 10fire department whether with or without compensation, shall be 11furnished to the Illinois State Police and to the Federal 12Bureau of Investigation by the commission.13    Whenever a commission is authorized or required by law to 14consider some aspect of criminal history record information 15for the purpose of carrying out its statutory powers and 16responsibilities, then, upon request and payment of fees in 17conformance with the requirements of Section 2605-400 of the 18Illinois State Police Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 19Illinois, the Illinois State Police is authorized to furnish, 20pursuant to positive identification, the information contained 21in State files as is necessary to fulfill the request.22    (j) Temporary appointments. In order to prevent a stoppage 23of public business, to meet extraordinary exigencies, or to 24prevent material impairment of the fire department, the 25commission may make temporary appointments, to remain in force 26only until regular appointments are made under the provisions   HB1647- 52 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1of this Division, but never to exceed 60 days. No temporary 2appointment of any one person shall be made more than twice in 3any calendar year.4    (k) A person who knowingly divulges or receives test 5questions or answers before a written examination, or 6otherwise knowingly violates or subverts any requirement of 7this Section, commits a violation of this Section and may be 8subject to charges for official misconduct.9    A person who is the knowing recipient of test information 10in advance of the examination shall be disqualified from the 11examination or discharged from the position to which he or she 12was appointed, as applicable, and otherwise subjected to 13disciplinary actions.14(Source: P.A. 101-489, eff. 8-23-19; 102-375, eff. 8-13-21; 15102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 165-13-22.) 17    (65 ILCS 5/10-2.1-6.4)18    Sec. 10-2.1-6.4. Alternative procedure; original 19appointment; full-time firefighter.20    (a) Authority. The Joint Labor and Management Committee 21(JLMC), as defined in Section 50 of the Fire Department 22Promotion Act, may establish a community outreach program to 23market the profession of firefighter and firefighter-paramedic 24so as to ensure the pool of applicants recruited is of broad 25diversity and the highest quality. Nothing in this Section   HB1647- 53 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1requires that the Joint Labor and Management Committee 2establish or operate the community outreach program or master 3register of eligibles, or to contract with a testing agency to 4establish or operate such program or register, unless the 5Joint Labor and Management Committee chooses to do so. 6    For the purposes of this Section, "firefighter" means any 7person who has been prior to, on, or after the effective date 8of this amendatory Act of the 97th General Assembly appointed 9to a fire department or fire protection district, or employed 10by a State university, unit of local government, or Emergency 11Medical Services (EMS) System, and sworn or commissioned or 12employed to perform (i) firefighter duties, (ii) or paramedic, 13emergency medical technician (EMT), emergency medical 14technician-basic (EMT-B), emergency medical 15technician-intermediate (EMT-I), or advanced emergency medical 16technician (A-EMT) duties, (iii) or both, except that the 17following persons are not included: part-time firefighters; 18auxiliary, reserve, or voluntary firefighters, including 19paid-on-call firefighters; clerks and dispatchers or other 20civilian employees of a fire department or fire protection 21district who are not routinely expected to perform firefighter 22duties; and elected officials.23    (b) Eligibility. Persons eligible for placement on the 24master register of eligibles shall consist of the following:25        Persons who have participated in and received a 26    passing total score on the mental aptitude, physical   HB1647- 54 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1    ability, and preference components of a regionally 2    administered test based on the standards described in this 3    Section. The standards for administering these tests and 4    the minimum passing score required for placement on this 5    list shall be as is set forth in this Section.6        Qualified candidates shall be listed on the master 7    register of eligibles in highest to lowest rank order 8    based upon their test scores without regard to their date 9    of examination. Candidates listed on the master register 10    of eligibles shall be eligible for appointment for 2 years 11    after the date of the certification of their final score 12    on the register without regard to the date of their 13    examination. After 2 years, the candidate's name shall be 14    struck from the list.15        Any person currently employed as a full-time member of 16    a fire department or any person who has experienced a 17    non-voluntary (and non-disciplinary) separation from the 18    active workforce due to a reduction in the number of 19    departmental officers, who was appointed pursuant to 20    Division 1 of Article 10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, 21    Division 2.1 of Article 10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, 22    or the Fire Protection District Act, and who during the 23    previous 24 months participated in and received a passing 24    score on the physical ability and mental aptitude 25    components of the test may request that his or her name be 26    added to the master register. Any eligible person may be   HB1647- 55 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1    offered employment by a local commission under the same 2    procedures as provided by this Section except that the 3    apprenticeship period may be waived and the applicant may 4    be immediately issued a certificate of original 5    appointment by the local commission.6    (c) Qualifications for placement on register of eligibles. 7The purpose for establishing a master register of eligibles 8shall be to identify applicants who possess and demonstrate 9the mental aptitude and physical ability to perform the duties 10required of members of the fire department in order to provide 11the highest quality of service to the public. To this end, all 12applicants for original appointment to an affected fire 13department through examination conducted by the Joint Labor 14and Management Committee (JLMC) shall be subject to 15examination and testing which shall be public, competitive, 16and open to all applicants. Any examination and testing 17procedure utilized under subsection (e) of this Section shall 18be supported by appropriate validation evidence and shall 19comply with all applicable state and federal laws. Any 20subjective component of the testing must be administered by 21certified assessors. All qualifying and disqualifying factors 22applicable to examination processes for local commissions in 23this amendatory Act of the 97th General Assembly shall be 24applicable to persons participating in Joint Labor and 25Management Committee examinations unless specifically provided 26otherwise in this Section.  HB1647- 56 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1    Notice of the time, place, general scope, and fee of every 2JLMC examination shall be given by the JLMC or designated 3testing agency, as applicable, by a publication at least 30 4days preceding the examination, in one or more newspapers 5published in the region, or if no newspaper is published 6therein, then in one or more newspapers with a general 7circulation within the region. The JLMC may publish the notice 8on the JLMC's Internet website. Additional notice of the 9examination may be given as the JLMC shall prescribe.10    (d) Examination and testing components for placement on 11register of eligibles. The examination and qualifying 12standards for placement on the master register of eligibles 13and employment shall be based on the following components: 14mental aptitude, physical ability, preferences, moral 15character, and health. The mental aptitude, physical ability, 16and preference components shall determine an applicant's 17qualification for and placement on the master register of 18eligibles. The consideration of an applicant's general moral 19character and health shall be administered on a pass-fail 20basis after a conditional offer of employment is made by a 21local commission.22    (e) Mental aptitude. Examination of an applicant's mental 23aptitude shall be based upon written examination and an 24applicant's prior experience demonstrating an aptitude for and 25commitment to service as a member of a fire department. 26Written examinations shall be practical in character and   HB1647- 57 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1relate to those matters that fairly test the capacity of the 2persons examined to discharge the duties performed by members 3of a fire department. Written examinations shall be 4administered in a manner that ensures the security and 5accuracy of the scores achieved. Any subjective component of 6the testing must be administered by certified assessors. No 7person who does not possess a high school diploma or an 8equivalent high school education shall be placed on a register 9of eligibles. Local commissions may establish educational, 10emergency medical service licensure, and other pre-requisites 11for hire within their jurisdiction.12    (f) Physical ability. All candidates shall be required to 13undergo an examination of their physical ability to perform 14the essential functions included in the duties they may be 15called upon to perform as a member of a fire department. For 16the purposes of this Section, essential functions of the job 17are functions associated with duties that a firefighter may be 18called upon to perform in response to emergency calls. The 19frequency of the occurrence of those duties as part of the fire 20department's regular routine shall not be a controlling factor 21in the design of examination criteria or evolutions selected 22for testing. These physical examinations shall be open, 23competitive, and based on industry standards designed to test 24each applicant's physical abilities in each of the following 25dimensions:26        (1) Muscular strength to perform tasks and evolutions   HB1647- 58 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1    that may be required in the performance of duties 2    including grip strength, leg strength, and arm strength. 3    Tests shall be conducted under anaerobic as well as 4    aerobic conditions to test both the candidate's speed and 5    endurance in performing tasks and evolutions. Tasks tested 6    are to be based on industry standards developed by the 7    JLMC by rule.8        (2) The ability to climb ladders, operate from 9    heights, walk or crawl in the dark along narrow and uneven 10    surfaces, and operate in proximity to hazardous 11    environments.12        (3) The ability to carry out critical, time-sensitive, 13    and complex problem solving during physical exertion in 14    stressful and hazardous environments. The testing 15    environment may be hot and dark with tightly enclosed 16    spaces, flashing lights, sirens, and other distractions.17    The tests utilized to measure each applicant's 18capabilities in each of these dimensions may be tests based on 19industry standards currently in use or equivalent tests 20approved by the Joint Labor-Management Committee of the Office 21of the State Fire Marshal. 22    (g) Scoring of examination components. The examination 23components shall be graded on a 100-point scale. A person's 24position on the master register of eligibles shall be 25determined by the person's score on the written examination, 26the person successfully passing the physical ability   HB1647- 59 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1component, and the addition of any applicable preference 2points.3    Applicants who have achieved at least the minimum score as 4set by the JLMC, and who successfully pass the physical 5ability examination shall be placed on the initial eligibility 6register. Minimum scores should be set by the commission so as 7to demonstrate a candidate's ability to perform the essential 8functions of the job. The minimum score set by the commission 9shall be supported by appropriate validation evidence and 10shall comply with all applicable State and federal laws. 11Applicable preference points shall be added to the written 12examination scores for all applicants who qualify for the 13initial eligibility register. Applicants who score at or above 14the minimum passing score as set by the JLMC, including any 15applicable preference points, shall be placed on the master 16register of eligibles by the JLMC.17    These persons shall take rank upon the register as 18candidates in the order of their relative excellence based on 19the highest to the lowest total points scored on the mental 20aptitude and physical ability components, plus any applicable 21preference points requested and verified by the JLMC, or 22approved testing agency.23    No more than 60 days after each examination, a revised 24master register of eligibles shall be posted by the JLMC 25showing the final grades of the candidates without reference 26to priority of time of examination.  HB1647- 60 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1    (h) Preferences. The board shall give military, education, 2and experience preference points to those who qualify for 3placement on the master register of eligibles, on the same 4basis as provided for examinations administered by a local 5commission.6    No person entitled to preference or credit shall be 7required to claim the credit before any examination held under 8the provisions of this Section. The preference shall be given 9after the posting or publication of the applicant's initial 10score at the request of the person before finalizing the 11scores from all applicants taking part in a JLMC examination. 12Candidates who are eligible for preference credit shall make a 13claim in writing within 10 days after the posting of the 14initial scores from any JLMC test or the claim shall be deemed 15waived. Once preference points are awarded, the candidates 16shall be certified to the master register in accordance with 17their final score including preference points.18    (i) Firefighter apprentice and firefighter-paramedic 19apprentice. The employment of an applicant to an apprentice 20position (including a currently employed full-time member of a 21fire department whose apprenticeship may be reduced or waived) 22shall be subject to the applicant passing the moral character 23standards and health examinations of the local commission. In 24addition, a local commission may require as a condition of 25employment that the applicant demonstrate current physical 26ability by either passing the local commission's approved   HB1647- 61 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1physical ability examination, or by presenting proof of 2participating in and receiving a passing score on the physical 3ability component of a JLMC test within a period of up to 12 4months before the date of the conditional offer of employment. 5Applicants shall be subject to the local commission's initial 6hire background review including criminal history, employment 7history, moral character, oral examination, and medical 8examinations which may include polygraph, psychological, and 9drug screening components, all on a pass-fail basis. The 10medical examinations must be conducted last, and may only be 11performed after a conditional offer of employment has been 12extended.13    (j) Selection from list. Any municipality or fire 14protection district that is a party to an intergovernmental 15agreement under the terms of which persons have been tested 16for placement on the master register of eligibles shall be 17entitled to offer employment to any person on the list 18irrespective of their ranking on the list. The offer of 19employment shall be to the position of firefighter apprentice 20or firefighter-paramedic apprentice.21    Applicants passing these tests may be employed as a 22firefighter apprentice or a firefighter-paramedic apprentice 23who shall serve an apprenticeship period of 12 months or less 24according to the terms and conditions of employment as the 25employing municipality or district offers, or as provided for 26under the terms of any collective bargaining agreement then in   HB1647- 62 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1effect. The apprenticeship period is separate from the 2probationary period.3    Service during the apprenticeship period shall be on a 4probationary basis. During the apprenticeship period, the 5apprentice's training and performance shall be monitored and 6evaluated by a Joint Apprenticeship Committee.7    The Joint Apprenticeship Committee shall consist of 4 8members who shall be regular members of the fire department 9with at least 10 years of full-time work experience as a 10firefighter or firefighter-paramedic. The fire chief and the 11president of the exclusive bargaining representative 12recognized by the employer shall each appoint 2 members to the 13Joint Apprenticeship Committee. In the absence of an exclusive 14collective bargaining representative, the chief shall appoint 15the remaining 2 members who shall be from the ranks of company 16officer and firefighter with at least 10 years of work 17experience as a firefighter or firefighter-paramedic. In the 18absence of a sufficient number of qualified firefighters, the 19Joint Apprenticeship Committee members shall have the amount 20of experience and the type of qualifications as is reasonable 21given the circumstances of the fire department. In the absence 22of a full-time member in a rank between chief and the highest 23rank in a bargaining unit, the Joint Apprenticeship Committee 24shall be reduced to 2 members, one to be appointed by the chief 25and one by the union president, if any. If there is no 26exclusive bargaining representative, the chief shall appoint   HB1647- 63 -LRB104 08523 RTM 18575 b1the second member of the Joint Apprenticeship Committee from 2among qualified members in the ranks of company officer and 3below. Before the conclusion of the apprenticeship period, the 4Joint Apprenticeship Committee shall meet to consider the 5apprentice's progress and performance and vote to retain the 6apprentice as a member of the fire department or to terminate 7the apprenticeship. If 3 of the 4 members of the Joint 8Apprenticeship Committee affirmatively vote to retain the 9apprentice (if a 2 member Joint Apprenticeship Committee 10exists, then both members must affirmatively vote to retain 11the apprentice), the local commission shall issue the 12apprentice a certificate of original appointment to the fire 13department.14    (k) A person who knowingly divulges or receives test 15questions or answers before a written examination, or 16otherwise knowingly violates or subverts any requirement of 17this Section, commits a violation of this Section and may be 18subject to charges for official misconduct.19    A person who is the knowing recipient of test information 20in advance of the examination shall be disqualified from the 21examination or discharged from the position to which he or she 22was appointed, as applicable, and otherwise subjected to 23disciplinary actions.24    (l) Applicability. This Section does not apply to a 25municipality with more than 1,000,000 inhabitants. 26(Source: P.A. 102-188, eff. 1-1-22.)